Montana, session 2025, HB77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 3-5-901, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-5-901. State assumption of district court expenses. (1) There is a state-funded district court
program under the judicial branch. Under this program, the office of court administrator shall fund all district
court costs, except as provided in subsection (3). These costs include but are not limited to the following:
(a) salaries and benefits for:
(i) district court judges;
(ii) law clerks;
(iii) court reporters, as provided in 3-5-601;
(iv) juvenile probation officers, youth division offices staff, and assessment officers of the youth
court;
(v) standing masters; and
(vi) other employees of the district court;
(b) in criminal cases:
(i) fees for transcripts of proceedings, as provided in 3-5-604;
(ii) witness fees and necessary expenses, as provided in 46-15-116;
(iii) juror fees and necessary expenses;
(iv) for a psychiatric examination under 46-14-202, the cost of the examination and other
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
associated expenses, as provided in 46-14-202(4); and
(v) for commitment under 46-14-221, the cost of transporting the defendant to the custody of the
director of the department of public health and human services to be placed in an appropriate facility of the
department of public health and human services and of transporting the defendant back for any proceedings, as
provided in 46-14-221(5);
(c) except as provided in 47-1-119, the district court expenses in all postconviction proceedings
held pursuant to Title 46, chapter 21, and in all habeas corpus proceedings held pursuant to Title 46, chapter
22, and appeals from those proceedings;
(d) except as provided in 47-1-119, the following expenses incurred by the state in federal habeas
corpus cases that challenge the validity of a conviction or of a sentence:
(i) transcript fees;
(ii) witness fees; and
(iii) expenses for psychiatric examinations;
(e) except as provided in 47-1-119, the following expenses incurred by the state in a proceeding
held pursuant to Title 41, chapter 3, part 4 or 6, that seeks temporary investigative authority of a youth,
temporary legal custody of a youth, or termination of the parent-child legal relationship and permanent custody:
(i) transcript fees;
(ii) witness fees;
(iii) expenses for medical and psychological evaluation of a youth or the youth's parent, guardian,
or other person having physical or legal custody of the youth except for expenses for services that a person is
eligible to receive under a public program that provides medical or psychological evaluation;
(iv) expenses associated with appointment of a guardian ad litem or child advocate for the youth;
and
(v) expenses associated with court-ordered alternative dispute resolution;
(f) except as provided in 47-1-119, costs of juror and witness fees and witness expenses before a
grand jury;
(g) costs of the court-sanctioned educational program concerning the effects of dissolution of
marriage on children, as required in 40-4-226, and expenses of education when ordered for the investigation
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
and preparation of a report concerning parenting arrangements, as provided in 40-4-215(2)(a);
(h) except as provided in 47-1-119, all district court expenses associated with civil jury trials if
similar expenses were paid out of the district court fund or the county general fund in any previous year;
(i) all other costs associated with the operation and maintenance of the district court, including
contract costs for court reporters who are independent contractors; and
(j) costs associated with the operation and maintenance of the youth court and youth court
division operations pursuant to 41-5-111 and subsection (1)(a) of this section, except for those costs paid by
other entities identified in Title 41, chapter 5.
(2) If a cost is not paid directly by the office of court administrator, the county shall pay the cost
and the office of court administrator shall reimburse the county within 30 days of receipt of a claim.
(3) For the purposes of subsection (1), district court costs paid by the office of court administrator
do not include:
(a) costs for clerks of district court and employees and expenses of the offices of the clerks of
district court;
(b) costs of providing and maintaining district court office space; or
(c) charges incurred against a county by virtue of any provision of Title 7 or 46."
Section 2. Section 41-3-422, MCA, is amended to read:
" 41-3-422. (Temporary) Abuse and neglect petitions -- burden of proof. (1) (a) Proceedings
under this chapter must be initiated by the filing of a petition. A petition may request the following relief:
(i) immediate protection and emergency protective services, as provided in 41-3-427 ;
(ii) temporary investigative authority, as provided in 41-3-433 ;
(iii) temporary legal custody, as provided in 41-3-442 ;
(iv) long-term custody, as provided in 41-3-445 ;
(v) termination of the parent-child legal relationship, as provided in 41-3-607 ;
(vi) appointment of a guardian pursuant to 41-3-444 ;
(vii) a determination that preservation or reunification services need not be provided; or
(viii) any combination of the provisions of subsections (1)(a)(i) through (1)(a)(vii) or any other relief
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
that may be required for the best interests of the child.
(b) The petition may be modified for different relief at any time within the discretion of the court.
(c) A petition for temporary legal custody may be the initial petition filed in a case.
(d) A petition for the termination of the parent-child legal relationship may be the initial petition filed
in a case if a request for a determination that preservation or reunification services need not be provided is
made in the petition.
(2) The county attorney, attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county shall file all petitions
under this chapter. A petition filed by the county attorney, attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county
must be accompanied by:
(a) an affidavit by the department alleging that the child appears to have been abused or neglected
and stating the basis for the petition; and
(b) a separate notice to the court stating any statutory time deadline for a hearing.
(3) Abuse and neglect petitions must be given highest preference by the court in setting hearing
dates.
(4) An abuse and neglect petition is a civil action brought in the name of the state of Montana. The
Montana Rules of Civil Procedure and the Montana Rules of Evidence apply except as modified in this chapter.
Proceedings under a petition are not a bar to criminal prosecution.
(5) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b), the person filing the abuse and neglect petition has
the burden of presenting evidence required to justify the relief requested and establishing:
(i) probable cause for the issuance of an order for immediate protection and emergency protective
services or an order for temporary investigative authority ;
(ii) a preponderance of the evidence for an order of adjudication or temporary legal custody;
(iii) a preponderance of the evidence for an order of long-term custody; or
(iv) clear and convincing evidence for an order terminating the parent-child legal relationship.
(b) If a proceeding under this chapter involves an Indian child, as defined in the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. 1901, et seq., or 41-3-1303, the standards of proof required for legal relief under
the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act provided for in Title 41, chapter
3, part 13, apply.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
(6) (a) Except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act and the Montana Indian Child
Welfare Act, if applicable, the parents or parent, guardian, or other person or agency having legal custody of
the child named in the petition, if residing in the state, must be served personally with a copy of the initial
petition and a petition to terminate the parent-child legal relationship at least 5 days before the date set for
hearing. If the person or agency cannot be served personally, the person or agency may be served by
publication as provided in 41-3-428 and 41-3-429.
(b) Copies of all other petitions must be served upon the person or the person's attorney of record
by certified mail, by personal service, or by publication as provided in 41-3-428 and 41-3-429. If service is by
certified mail, the department must receive a return receipt signed by the person to whom the notice was mailed
for the service to be effective. Service of the notice is considered to be effective if, in the absence of a return
receipt, the person to whom the notice was mailed appears at the hearing.
(7) If personal service cannot be made upon the parents or parent, guardian, or other person or
agency having legal custody, the court shall immediately provide for the appointment or assignment of an
attorney as provided for in 41-3-425 to represent the unavailable party when, in the opinion of the court, the
interests of justice require. If personal service cannot be made upon a putative father, the court may not provide
for the appointment or assignment of counsel as provided for in 41-3-425 to represent the father unless, in the
opinion of the court, the interests of justice require counsel to be appointed or assigned.
(8) If a parent of the child is a minor, notice must be given to the minor parent's parents or
guardian, and if there is no guardian, the court shall appoint one.
(9) (a) Any person interested in any cause under this chapter has the right to appear. Any foster
parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the child must be given legal notice by the attorney filing the
petition of all judicial hearings for the child and has the right to be heard. The right to appear or to be heard
does not make that person a party to the action. Any foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the
child must be given notice of all reviews by the reviewing body.
(b) A foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative of the child who is caring for or a relative of the
child who has cared for a child who is the subject of the petition who appears at a hearing set pursuant to this
section may be allowed by the court to intervene in the action if the court, after a hearing in which evidence is
presented on those subjects provided for in 41-3-437 (4), determines that the intervention of the person is in the
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
best interests of the child. A person granted intervention pursuant to this subsection is entitled to participate in
the adjudicatory hearing held pursuant to 41-3-437 and to notice and participation in subsequent proceedings
held pursuant to this chapter involving the custody of the child.
(c) Whenever a child is placed with a foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative, the department
shall provide written notice to the foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative explaining the foster parent's,
preadoptive parent's, or relative's rights under this subsection (9) to receive notice, to appear and be heard, and
to attempt to intervene in proceedings under this chapter.
(10) An abuse and neglect petition must state:
(a) the nature of the alleged abuse or neglect and of the relief requested;
(b) the full name, age, and address of the child and the name and address of the child's parents or
the guardian or person having legal custody of the child; and
(c) the names, addresses, and relationship to the child of all persons who are necessary parties to
the action.
(11) Any party in a proceeding pursuant to this section is entitled to counsel as provided in 41-3-
425.
(12) At any stage of the proceedings considered appropriate by the court, the court may order an
alternative dispute resolution proceeding or the parties may voluntarily participate in an alternative dispute
resolution proceeding. An alternative dispute resolution proceeding under this chapter may include a family
engagement meeting, mediation, or a settlement conference. If a court orders an alternative dispute resolution
proceeding, a party who does not wish to participate may file a motion objecting to the order. If the department
is a party to the original proceeding, a representative of the department who has complete authority to settle the
issue or issues in the original proceeding must be present at any alternative dispute resolution proceeding.
(13) Service of a petition under this section must be accompanied by a written notice advising the
child's parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child of the:
(a) right, pursuant to 41-3-425, to appointment or assignment of counsel if the person is indigent or
if appointment or assignment of counsel is required under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana
Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable;
(b) right to contest the allegations in the petition; and
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
(c) timelines for hearings and determinations required under this chapter.
(14) If appropriate, orders issued under this chapter must contain a notice provision advising a
child's parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child that:
(a) the court is required by federal and state laws to hold a permanency hearing to determine the
permanent placement of a child no later than 12 months after a judge determines that the child has been
abused or neglected or 12 months after the first 60 days that the child has been removed from the child's home;
(b) if a child has been in foster care for 15 of the last 22 months, state law presumes that
termination of parental rights is in the best interests of the child and the state is required to file a petition to
terminate parental rights; and
(c) completion of a treatment plan does not guarantee the return of a child.
(15) A court may appoint a standing master to conduct hearings and propose decisions and orders
to the court for court consideration and action. A standing master may not conduct a proceeding to terminate
parental rights. A standing master must be a member of the state bar of Montana and must be knowledgeable
in the area of child abuse and neglect laws. (Terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 55, Ch. 716, L. 2023.)
41-3-422. (Effective July 1, 2025) Abuse and neglect petitions -- burden of proof. (1) (a)
Proceedings under this chapter must be initiated by the filing of a petition. A petition may request the following
relief:
(i) immediate protection and emergency protective services, as provided in 41-3-427;
(ii) temporary investigative authority, as provided in 41-3-433 ;
(iii)(ii) temporary legal custody, as provided in 41-3-442;
(iv)(iii) long-term custody, as provided in 41-3-445;
(v)(iv) termination of the parent-child legal relationship, as provided in 41-3-607;
(vi)(v) appointment of a guardian pursuant to 41-3-444;
(vii)(vi) a determination that preservation or reunification services need not be provided; or
(viii)(vii)any combination of the provisions of subsections (1)(a)(i) through (1)(a)(vii) (1)(a)(vi) or any
other relief that may be required for the best interests of the child.
(b) The petition may be modified for different relief at any time within the discretion of the court.
(c) A petition for temporary legal custody may be the initial petition filed in a case.
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
(d) A petition for the termination of the parent-child legal relationship may be the initial petition filed
in a case if a request for a determination that preservation or reunification services need not be provided is
made in the petition.
(2) The county attorney, attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county shall file all petitions
under this chapter. A petition filed by the county attorney, attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county
must be accompanied by:
(a) an affidavit by the department alleging that the child appears to have been abused or neglected
and stating the basis for the petition; and
(b) a separate notice to the court stating any statutory time deadline for a hearing.
(3) Abuse and neglect petitions must be given highest preference by the court in setting hearing
dates.
(4) An abuse and neglect petition is a civil action brought in the name of the state of Montana. The
Montana Rules of Civil Procedure and the Montana Rules of Evidence apply except as modified in this chapter.
Proceedings under a petition are not a bar to criminal prosecution.
(5) (a) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b), the person filing the abuse and neglect petition has
the burden of presenting evidence required to justify the relief requested and establishing:
(i) probable cause for the issuance of an order for immediate protection and emergency protective
services or an order for temporary investigative authority;
(ii) a preponderance of the evidence for an order of adjudication or temporary legal custody;
(iii) a preponderance of the evidence for an order of long-term custody; or
(iv) clear and convincing evidence for an order terminating the parent-child legal relationship.
(b) If a proceeding under this chapter involves an Indian child, as defined in the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. 1901, et seq., the standards of proof required for legal relief under the federal
Indian Child Welfare Act apply.
(6) (a) Except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable, the parents or
parent, guardian, or other person or agency having legal custody of the child named in the petition, if residing in
the state, must be served personally with a copy of the initial petition and a petition to terminate the parent-child
legal relationship at least 5 days before the date set for hearing. If the person or agency cannot be served
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
personally, the person or agency may be served by publication as provided in 41-3-428 and 41-3-429.
(b) Copies of all other petitions must be served upon the person or the person's attorney of record
by certified mail, by personal service, or by publication as provided in 41-3-428 and 41-3-429. If service is by
certified mail, the department must receive a return receipt signed by the person to whom the notice was mailed
for the service to be effective. Service of the notice is considered to be effective if, in the absence of a return
receipt, the person to whom the notice was mailed appears at the hearing.
(7) If personal service cannot be made upon the parents or parent, guardian, or other person or
agency having legal custody, the court shall immediately provide for the appointment or assignment of an
attorney as provided for in 41-3-425 to represent the unavailable party when, in the opinion of the court, the
interests of justice require. If personal service cannot be made upon a putative father, the court may not provide
for the appointment or assignment of counsel as provided for in 41-3-425 to represent the father unless, in the
opinion of the court, the interests of justice require counsel to be appointed or assigned.
(8) If a parent of the child is a minor, notice must be given to the minor parent's parents or
guardian, and if there is no guardian, the court shall appoint one.
(9) (a) Any person interested in any cause under this chapter has the right to appear. Any foster
parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the child must be given legal notice by the attorney filing the
petition of all judicial hearings for the child and has the right to be heard. The right to appear or to be heard
does not make that person a party to the action. Any foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caring for the
child must be given notice of all reviews by the reviewing body.
(b) A foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative of the child who is caring for or a relative of the
child who has cared for a child who is the subject of the petition who appears at a hearing set pursuant to this
section may be allowed by the court to intervene in the action if the court, after a hearing in which evidence is
presented on those subjects provided for in 41-3-437(4), determines that the intervention of the person is in the
best interests of the child. A person granted intervention pursuant to this subsection is entitled to participate in
the adjudicatory hearing held pursuant to 41-3-437 and to notice and participation in subsequent proceedings
held pursuant to this chapter involving the custody of the child.
(c) Whenever a child is placed with a foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative, the department
shall provide written notice to the foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative explaining the foster parent's,
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
preadoptive parent's, or relative's rights under this subsection (9) to receive notice, to appear and be heard, and
to attempt to intervene in proceedings under this chapter.
(10) An abuse and neglect petition must state:
(a) the nature of the alleged abuse or neglect and of the relief requested;
(b) the full name, age, and address of the child and the name and address of the child's parents or
the guardian or person having legal custody of the child; and
(c) the names, addresses, and relationship to the child of all persons who are necessary parties to
the action.
(11) Any party in a proceeding pursuant to this section is entitled to counsel as provided in 41-3-
425.
(12) At any stage of the proceedings considered appropriate by the court, the court may order an
alternative dispute resolution proceeding or the parties may voluntarily participate in an alternative dispute
resolution proceeding. An alternative dispute resolution proceeding under this chapter may include a family
engagement meeting, mediation, or a settlement conference. If a court orders an alternative dispute resolution
proceeding, a party who does not wish to participate may file a motion objecting to the order. If the department
is a party to the original proceeding, a representative of the department who has complete authority to settle the
issue or issues in the original proceeding must be present at any alternative dispute resolution proceeding.
(13) Service of a petition under this section must be accompanied by a written notice advising the
child's parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child of the:
(a) right, pursuant to 41-3-425, to appointment or assignment of counsel if the person is indigent or
if appointment or assignment of counsel is required under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable;
(b) right to contest the allegations in the petition; and
(c) timelines for hearings and determinations required under this chapter.
(14) If appropriate, orders issued under this chapter must contain a notice provision advising a
child's parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child that:
(a) the court is required by federal and state laws to hold a permanency hearing to determine the
permanent placement of a child no later than 12 months after a judge determines that the child has been
abused or neglected or 12 months after the first 60 days that the child has been removed from the child's home;
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
(b) if a child has been in foster care for 15 of the last 22 months, state law presumes that
termination of parental rights is in the best interests of the child and the state is required to file a petition to
terminate parental rights; and
(c) completion of a treatment plan does not guarantee the return of a child.
(15) A court may appoint a standing master to conduct hearings and propose decisions and orders
to the court for court consideration and action. A standing master may not conduct a proceeding to terminate
parental rights. A standing master must be a member of the state bar of Montana and must be knowledgeable
in the area of child abuse and neglect laws."
Section 3. Section 41-3-427, MCA, is amended to read:
" 41-3-427. (Temporary) Petition for immediate protection and emergency protective services --
evidence and consideration of harm of removal -- order -- service. (1) (a) In a case in which it appears that
a child is abused or neglected or is in danger of being abused or neglected, the county attorney, the attorney
general, or an attorney hired by the county may file a petition for immediate protection and emergency
protective services. In implementing the policy of this section, the child's health and safety are of paramount
concern.
(b) A petition for immediate protection and emergency protective services must state the specific
authority requested and must be supported by an affidavit signed by a representative of the department stating
in detail the alleged facts upon which the request is based and the facts establishing probable cause or, if the
case is subject to the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act provided for in
Title 41, chapter 3, part 13, clear and convincing evidence that a child is abused or neglected or is in danger of
being abused or neglected.
(c) The affidavit of the department representative must contain:
(i) information, if any, regarding statements made by the parents about the facts of the case; and
(ii) specific, written documentation as to why the risk of allowing the child to remain at home
substantially outweighs the harm of removing the child, including consideration of:
(A) the emotional trauma the child is likely to experience if separated from the family;
(B) the child's relationships with other members of the household, including siblings;
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
(C) the child's schooling and social relationships that could be disrupted with a placement out of
the neighborhood;
(D) the impact the removal would have on services the child is receiving and on extracurricular
activities that benefit the child; and
(E) documentation of reasonable efforts made to keep the family intact.
(d) If from the alleged facts presented in the affidavit it appears to the court that there is probable
cause or, if the case is subject to the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act,
clear and convincing evidence to believe that the child has been abused or neglected or is in danger of being
abused and neglected, the judge shall grant emergency protective services and the relief authorized by
subsection (2) until the adjudication hearing or the temporary investigative hearing. If it appears from the
alleged facts contained in the affidavit that there is insufficient probable cause or, if the case is subject to the
federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act, clear and convincing evidence to
believe that the child has been abused or neglected or is in danger of being abused or neglected, the court
shall dismiss the petition.
(e) If the parents, parent, guardian, person having physical or legal custody of the child, or attorney
for the child disputes the material issues of fact contained in the affidavit or the veracity of the affidavit, the
person may request a contested show cause hearing pursuant to 41-3-432 within 10 days following service of
the petition and affidavit.
(f) The petition for immediate protection and emergency protective services must include a notice
advising the parents, parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child that the
parents, parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child may have a support
person present during any meeting with a child protection specialist concerning emergency protective services.
Reasonable accommodation must be made in scheduling an in-person meeting with the child protection
specialist.
(2) Pursuant to subsection (1), if the court finds probable cause or, if the case is subject to the
federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act, clear and convincing evidence based
on the petition and affidavit, the court may issue an order for immediate protection of the child. The court shall
consider the parents' statements, if any, included with the petition and any accompanying affidavit or report to
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
the court. If the court finds probable cause or, if the case is subject to the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the
Montana Indian Child Welfare Act, clear and convincing evidence, the court may issue an order granting the
following forms of relief, which do not constitute a court-ordered treatment plan under 41-3-443 :
(a) the right of entry by a peace officer or department worker;
(b) the right to place the child in temporary medical or out-of-home care, including but not limited to
care provided by a noncustodial parent, kinship or foster family, group home, or institution;
(c) the right of the department to locate, contact, and share information with any extended family
members who may be considered as placement options for the child;
(d) a requirement that the parents, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody
furnish information that the court may designate and obtain evaluations that may be necessary to determine
whether a child is a youth in need of care;
(e) a requirement that the perpetrator of the alleged child abuse or neglect be removed from the
home to allow the child to remain in the home;
(f) a requirement that the parent provide the department with the name and address of the other
parent, if known, unless parental rights to the child have been terminated;
(g) a requirement that the parent provide the department with the names and addresses of
extended family members who may be considered as placement options for the child who is the subject of the
proceeding; and
(h) any other temporary disposition that may be required in the best interests of the child that does
not require an expenditure of money by the department unless the court finds after notice and a hearing that the
expenditure is reasonable and that resources are available for payment. The department is the payor of last
resort after all family, insurance, and other resources have been examined.
(3) When requesting emergency protective services under this section, the department shall
provide the court with information on:
(a) whether a kinship placement is available; or
(b) if a family foster home has been identified:
(i) where the foster home is located in relation to the child's home;
(ii) whether the foster placement can accommodate the proposed visitation schedule;
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
(iii) whether siblings can be placed together;
(iv) the proximity of the foster home to the child's home and school;
(v) whether the child will be able to observe religious or cultural practices important to the child;
and
(vi) whether the foster home is able to accommodate any special needs the child may have.
(4) In making a removal determination, the court shall weigh and evaluate, in the factual setting,
the harm to the child that will result from removal and determine if allowing the child to remain in the home
substantially outweighs the harm of removal. Factors for consideration of the best interests of the child include
but are not limited to:
(a) the factors identified in subsections (1)(c)(ii)(A) through (1)(c)(ii)(D); and
(b) whether the department made reasonable efforts, as described in subsection (1)(c)(ii)(E), to
keep the family intact.
(5) (a) An order for removal of a child from the home must include a finding that:
(i) continued residence of the child with the parent is contrary to the welfare of the child;
(ii) an out-of-home placement is in the best interests of the child; and
(iii) the risk of allowing the child to remain in the home substantially outweighs the harm of removal.
(b) The court shall provide written findings to explain why the risk of the child's continued stay in
the home outweighs the harm of removing the child.
(6) The order for immediate protection of the child must require the person served to comply
immediately with the terms of the order and to appear before the court issuing the order on the date specified
for a show cause hearing. Upon a failure to comply or show cause, the court may hold the person in contempt
or place temporary physical custody of the child with the department until further order.
(7) The petition must be served as provided in 41-3-422 or, if the case involves an Indian child, as
provided in 41-3-1311. (Terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 55, Ch. 716, L. 2023.)
41-3-427. (Effective July 1, 2025) Petition for immediate protection and emergency protective
services -- evidence and consideration of harm of removal -- order -- service. (1) (a) In a case in which it
appears that a child is abused or neglected or is in danger of being abused or neglected, the county attorney,
the attorney general, or an attorney hired by the county may file a petition for immediate protection and
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
emergency protective services. In implementing the policy of this section, the child's health and safety are of
paramount concern.
(b) A petition for immediate protection and emergency protective services must state the specific
authority requested and must be supported by an affidavit signed by a representative of the department stating
in detail the alleged facts upon which the request is based and the facts establishing probable cause or, if the
case is subject to the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, clear and convincing evidence that a child is abused or
neglected or is in danger of being abused or neglected.
(c) The affidavit of the department representative must contain:
(i) information, if any, regarding statements made by the parents about the facts of the case; and
(ii) specific, written documentation as to why the risk of allowing the child to remain at home
substantially outweighs the harm of removing the child, including consideration of:
(A) the emotional trauma the child is likely to experience if separated from the family;
(B) the child's relationships with other members of the household, including siblings;
(C) the child's schooling and social relationships that could be disrupted with a placement out of
the neighborhood;
(D) the impact the removal would have on services the child is receiving and on extracurricular
activities that benefit the child; and
(E) documentation of reasonable efforts made to keep the family intact.
(d) If from the alleged facts presented in the affidavit it appears to the court that there is probable
cause or, if the case is subject to the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, clear and convincing evidence to believe
that the child has been abused or neglected or is in danger of being abused and neglected, the judge shall
grant emergency protective services and the relief authorized by subsection (2) until the adjudication hearing or
the temporary investigative hearing. If it appears from the alleged facts contained in the affidavit that there is
insufficient probable cause or, if the case is subject to the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, clear and convincing
evidence to believe that the child has been abused or neglected or is in danger of being abused or neglected,
the court shall dismiss the petition.
(e) If the parents, parent, guardian, person having physical or legal custody of the child, or attorney
for the child disputes the material issues of fact contained in the affidavit or the veracity of the affidavit, the
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
person may request a contested show cause hearing pursuant to 41-3-432 within 10 days following service of
the petition and affidavit.
(f) The petition for immediate protection and emergency protective services must include a notice
advising the parents, parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child that the
parents, parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child may have a support
person present during any meeting with a child protection specialist concerning emergency protective services.
Reasonable accommodation must be made in scheduling an in-person meeting with the child protection
specialist.
(g) An order for immediate protection and emergency protective services may not be issued for a
period longer than 90 days.
(2) Pursuant to subsection (1), if the court finds probable cause or, if the case is subject to the
federal Indian Child Welfare Act, clear and convincing evidence based on the petition and affidavit, the court
may issue an order for immediate protection of the child. The court shall consider the parents' statements, if
any, included with the petition and any accompanying affidavit or report to the court. If the court finds probable
cause or, if the case is subject to the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, clear and convincing evidence, the court
may issue an order granting the following forms of relief, which do not constitute a court-ordered treatment plan
under 41-3-443:
(a) the right of entry by a peace officer or department worker;
(b) the right to place the child in temporary medical or out-of-home care, including but not limited to
care provided by a noncustodial parent, kinship or foster family, group home, or institution;
(c) the right of the department to locate, contact, and share information with any extended family
members who may be considered as placement options for the child;
(d) a requirement that the parents, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody
furnish information that the court may designate and obtain evaluations that may be necessary to determine
whether a child is a youth in need of care;
(e) a requirement that the perpetrator of the alleged child abuse or neglect be removed from the
home to allow the child to remain in the home;
(f) a requirement that the parent provide the department with the name and address of the other
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
parent, if known, unless parental rights to the child have been terminated;
(g) a requirement that the parent provide the department with the names and addresses of
extended family members who may be considered as placement options for the child who is the subject of the
proceeding; and
(h) any other temporary disposition that may be required in the best interests of the child that does
not require an expenditure of money by the department unless the court finds after notice and a hearing that the
expenditure is reasonable and that resources are available for payment. The department is the payor of last
resort after all family, insurance, and other resources have been examined.
(3) When requesting emergency protective services under this section, the department shall
provide the court with information on:
(a) whether a kinship placement is available; or
(b) if a family foster home has been identified:
(i) where the foster home is located in relation to the child's home;
(ii) whether the foster placement can accommodate the proposed visitation schedule;
(iii) whether siblings can be placed together;
(iv) the proximity of the foster home to the child's home and school;
(v) whether the child will be able to observe religious or cultural practices important to the child;
and
(vi) whether the foster home is able to accommodate any special needs the child may have.
(4) In making a removal determination, the court shall weigh and evaluate, in the factual setting,
the harm to the child that will result from removal and determine if allowing the child to remain in the home
substantially outweighs the harm of removal. Factors for consideration of the best interests of the child include
but are not limited to:
(a) the factors identified in subsections (1)(c)(ii)(A) through (1)(c)(ii)(D); and
(b) whether the department made reasonable efforts, as described in subsection (1)(c)(ii)(E), to
keep the family intact.
(5) (a) An order for removal of a child from the home must include a finding that:
(i) continued residence of the child with the parent is contrary to the welfare of the child;
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
(ii) an out-of-home placement is in the best interests of the child; and
(iii) the risk of allowing the child to remain in the home substantially outweighs the harm of removal.
(b) The court shall provide written findings to explain why the risk of the child's continued stay in
the home outweighs the harm of removing the child.
(6) The order for immediate protection of the child must require the person served to comply
immediately with the terms of the order and to appear before the court issuing the order on the date specified
for a show cause hearing. Upon a failure to comply or show cause, the court may hold the person in contempt
or place temporary physical custody of the child with the department until further order.
(7) The petition must be served as provided in 41-3-422."
Section 4. Section 41-3-432, MCA, is amended to read:
" 41-3-432. (Temporary) Show cause hearing -- order. (1) (a) Except as provided in the federal
Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act provided for in Title 41, chapter 3, part 13, a
show cause hearing must be conducted within 20 days of the filing of an initial child abuse and neglect petition
unless otherwise stipulated by the parties pursuant to 41-3-434 or unless an extension of time is granted by the
court. A separate notice to the court stating the statutory time deadline for a hearing must accompany any
petition to which the time deadline applies.
(b) If a proceeding under this chapter involves an Indian child and is subject to the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act, a qualified expert witness is required to testify that
the continued custody of the Indian child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional
or physical damage to the Indian child.
(c) The court may grant an extension of time for a show cause hearing only upon a showing of
substantial injustice and shall order an appropriate remedy that considers the best interests of the child.
(2) The person filing the petition has the burden of presenting evidence establishing probable
cause for the issuance of an order for temporary investigative authority after the show cause hearing, except as
provided by the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable.
(3) If a contested show cause hearing is requested pursuant to 41-3-427 based upon a disputed
issue of material fact or a dispute regarding the veracity of the affidavit of the department, the court may
- 18 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
consider all evidence and shall provide an opportunity for a parent, guardian, or other person having physical or
legal custody of the child to provide testimony regarding the disputed issues. Hearsay evidence of statements
made by the affected child is admissible at the hearing. The parent, guardian, or other person may be
represented by legal counsel and may be appointed or assigned counsel as provided for in 41-3-425.
(4) At the show cause hearing, the court shall explain the procedures to be followed in the case
and explain the parties' rights, including the right to request appointment or assignment of counsel if indigent or
if appointment or assignment of counsel is required under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana
Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable, and the right to challenge the allegations contained in the petition. The
parent, guardian, or other person having physical or legal custody of the child must be given the opportunity to
admit or deny the allegations contained in the petition at the show cause hearing. Inquiry must be made to
determine whether the notice requirements of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or 41-3-1311, if applicable,
have been met.
(5) Except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act or the Montana Indian Child Welfare
Act, if applicable, the court shall make written findings on issues including but not limited to the following:
(a) whether the child should be returned home immediately if there has been an emergency
removal or remain in temporary out-of-home care or be removed from the home;
(b) if removal is ordered or continuation of removal is ordered, why continuation of the child in the
home would be contrary to the child's best interests and welfare;
(c) whether the department has made reasonable efforts to avoid protective placement of the child
or to make it possible to safely return the child to the child's home;
(d) financial support of the child, including inquiry into the financial ability of the parents, guardian,
or other person having physical or legal custody of the child to contribute to the costs for the care, custody, and
treatment of the child and requirements of a contribution for those costs pursuant to 41-3-446; and
(e) whether another hearing is needed and, if so, the date and time of the next hearing.
(6) The court may consider:
(a) terms and conditions for parental visitation; and
(b) whether orders for examinations, evaluations, counseling, immediate services, or protection are
needed.
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
(7) Following the show cause hearing, the court may enter an order for the relief requested or
amend a previous order for immediate protection of the child if one has been entered. The order must be in
writing.
(8) If a child who has been removed from the child's home is not returned home after the show
cause hearing or if removal is ordered, the parents or parent, guardian, or other person or agency having
physical or legal custody of the child named in the petition may request that a citizen review board, if available
pursuant to part 10 of this chapter, review the case within 30 days of the show cause hearing and make a
recommendation to the district court, as provided in 41-3-1010.
(9) Adjudication of a child as a youth in need of care may be made at the show cause hearing if
the requirements of 41-3-437(2) are met. If not made at the show cause hearing, adjudication under 41-3-437
must be made within the time limits required by 41-3-437 unless adjudication occurs earlier by stipulation of the
parties pursuant to 41-3-434 and order of the court. (Terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 55, Ch. 716, L. 2023.)
41-3-432. (Effective July 1, 2025) Show cause hearing -- order. (1) (a) Except as provided in the
federal Indian Child Welfare Act, a show cause hearing must be conducted within 20 days of the filing of an
initial child abuse and neglect petition unless otherwise stipulated by the parties pursuant to 41-3-434 or unless
an extension of time is granted by the court. A separate notice to the court stating the statutory time deadline
for a hearing must accompany any petition to which the time deadline applies.
(b) If a proceeding under this chapter involves an Indian child and is subject to the federal Indian
Child Welfare Act, a qualified expert witness is required to testify that the continued custody of the child by the
parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child.
(c) The court may grant an extension of time for a show cause hearing only upon a showing of
substantial injustice and shall order an appropriate remedy that considers the best interests of the child.
(2) The person filing the petition has the burden of presenting evidence establishing probable
cause for the issuance of an order for temporary investigative authority after the show cause hearing, except as
provided by the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable.
(3)(2) If a contested show cause hearing is requested pursuant to 41-3-427 based upon a disputed
issue of material fact or a dispute regarding the veracity of the affidavit of the department, the court may
consider all evidence and shall provide an opportunity for a parent, guardian, or other person having physical or
- 20 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
legal custody of the child to provide testimony regarding the disputed issues. Hearsay evidence of statements
made by the affected child is admissible at the hearing. The parent, guardian, or other person may be
represented by legal counsel and may be appointed or assigned counsel as provided for in 41-3-425.
(4)(3) At the show cause hearing, the court shall explain the procedures to be followed in the case
and explain the parties' rights, including the right to request appointment or assignment of counsel if indigent or
if appointment or assignment of counsel is required under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable,
and the right to challenge the allegations contained in the petition. The parent, guardian, or other person having
physical or legal custody of the child must be given the opportunity to admit or deny the allegations contained in
the petition at the show cause hearing. Inquiry must be made to determine whether the notice requirements of
the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable, have been met.
(5)(4) Except as provided in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act, if applicable, the court shall make
written findings on issues including but not limited to the following:
(a) whether the child should be returned home immediately if there has been an emergency
removal or remain in temporary out-of-home care or be removed from the home;
(b) if removal is ordered or continuation of removal is ordered, why continuation of the child in the
home would be contrary to the child's best interests and welfare;
(c) whether the department has made reasonable efforts to avoid protective placement of the child
or to make it possible to safely return the child to the child's home;
(d) financial support of the child, including inquiry into the financial ability of the parents, guardian,
or other person having physical or legal custody of the child to contribute to the costs for the care, custody, and
treatment of the child and requirements of a contribution for those costs pursuant to 41-3-446; and
(e) whether another hearing is needed and, if so, the date and time of the next hearing.
(6)(5) The court may consider:
(a) terms and conditions for parental visitation; and
(b) whether orders for examinations, evaluations, counseling, immediate services, or protection are
needed.
(7)(6) Following the show cause hearing, the court may enter an order for the relief requested or
amend a previous order for immediate protection of the child if one has been entered. The order must be in
- 21 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 77
writing.
(8)(7) If a child who has been removed from the child's home is not returned home after the show
cause hearing or if removal is ordered, the parents or parent, guardian, or other person or agency having
physical or legal custody of the child named in the petition may request that a citizen review board, if available
pursuant to part 10 of this chapter, review the case within 30 days of the show cause hearing and make a
recommendation to the district court, as provided in 41-3-1010.
(9)(8) Adjudication of a child as a youth in need of care may be made at the show cause hearing if
the requirements of 41-3-437(2) are met. If not made at the show cause hearing, adjudication under 41-3-437
must be made within the time limits required by 41-3-437 unless adjudication occurs earlier by stipulation of the
parties pursuant to 41-3-434 and order of the court."
Section 5. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are repealed:
41-3-433. Temporary investigative authority.
Section 6. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
- END -
- 22 - Authorized Print Version – HB 77
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 77, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 77
INTRODUCED BY S. HOWELL
BY REQUEST OF THE CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES GROUP
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING LAWS RELATED TO CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT INVESTIGATIONS BY
THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES; REMOVING TEMPORARY
INVESTIGATIVE AUTHORITY; AMENDING SECTIONS 3-5-901, 41-3-422, 41-3-427, AND 41-3-432, MCA;
AND REPEALING SECTION 41-3-433, MCA.”